Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska25-1119
Assessment of amount of recovery.

When, by the verdict, either party is entitled to recover money of the adverse party, the jury in their verdict must assess the amount of recovery.

R.S.1867, Code § 295, p. 443;

R.S.1913, § 7858;

C.S.1922, § 8802;

C.S.1929, § 20-1119;

R.S.1943, § 25-1119.

Verdict for the plaintiff in amount of "no money" is in effect no verdict at all. Bushey v. French, 171 Neb. 809, 108 N.W.2d 237 (1961).

Where jury finds for plaintiff on its cause of action, and also for defendant on its counterclaim or setoff, verdict must show amount of each finding. Horse Shoe Lake Drainage Dist. v. Crane Co., 112 Neb. 323, 199 N.W. 526 (1924).

Court cannot disregard verdict and enter such judgment as evidence warrants; if verdict is not sustained by evidence, remedy is by motion for new trial. Kenesaw Mill & E. Co. v. Aufdenkamp, 106 Neb. 246, 183 N.W. 294 (1921).

Court may in action of debt add interest when such appears from verdict to be so intended by jury. Wiruth v. Lashmett, 85 Neb. 286, 123 N.W. 427 (1909).

Verdict may assess different amounts against different defendants. Lininger & Metcalf Co. v. Webb, 51 Neb. 10, 70 N.W. 519 (1897).

Failure to include in judgment interest allowed by jury on verdict was not prejudicial to defendant. Wiseman v. Ziegler, 41 Neb. 886, 60 N.W. 320 (1894).